District of Columbia statutes.
49-801

Duties of officers.

The departmental and military duties of the officers provided for in this subtitle shall be correlative with those discharged by similarly designated officers in the Army of the United States.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 781, ch. 328, § 60
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 636, ch. 146, § 68
This section is referenced in § 49-902.
1981 Ed., § 39-901.
1973 Ed., § 39-901.
The reference to “this subtitle” in this section includes all sections of Subtitle I of Title 49 except §§ 49-217, 49-303, and 49-906.